Washington statutes.
RCW 18.310.130

Recordkeeping.

An appraisal management company must certify to the department on initial application and upon renewal, that it maintains a detailed record of each service request that it receives and the appraiser that performs the appraisal for the appraisal management company. This statement must also certify that the appraisal management company maintains a complete copy of the completed appraisal report, for a minimum period of five years after the appraisal is completed, or two years after final disposition of a judicial proceeding related to the assignment, whichever period expires later.

[ 2010 c 179 s 12.]